Arkansas, session 2025, HB1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 98, is repealed.
Chapter 98 — Registration of Disease Intervention Specialists

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

17-98-101. Purpose.
Since the profession of disease intervention specialist significantly
affects the lives of the people of this state, it is the purpose of this
chapter to protect the public by setting standards of qualification,
training, and experience for those who seek to represent themselves to the
public as disease intervention specialists and by promoting high standards of
professional performance for those engaged in the practice of disease
intervention.

17-98-102. Restriction of registry.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to restrict registry to those
individuals who are qualified under this chapter to be disease intervention
specialists. It is not the intent of the General Assembly to register
*JMB299*
02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
persons, such as state employees, in the job classification of disease
intervention specialist.

17-98-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Associate disease intervention specialist” means a person
who meets the educational and specialized training requirements of this
chapter, but does not meet the experience requirements established for a
registered disease intervention specialist;
(2) “Continuing education unit” means value given for
participation in organized continuing education experience under reasonable
sponsorship, capable direction, and qualified instruction approved by the
State Board of Health;
(3) “Disease intervention” means activities used to prevent
disease transmission by ensuring that those people who have a sexually
transmitted disease and those who have been exposed to a sexually transmitted
disease are promptly located, examined, and adequately treated before any
signs or symptoms of a disease appear or before any laboratory evidence of a
disease is demonstrable or before an infected person would have sought
treatment voluntarily;
(4) “Disease intervention specialist-in-training” means a person
who meets the educational requirements of this chapter, but does not meet the
specialized training requirements established for an associate disease
intervention specialist; and
(5) “Registered disease intervention specialist” means a trained
healthcare professional meeting the educational, specialized training, and
experience requirements of this chapter who practices sexually transmitted
disease intervention with patients, sex partners, and others suspected of
having a sexually transmitted disease.

17-98-104. Exemptions.
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit members of the
clergy, Christian Science practitioners, and licensed healthcare
professionals, such as physicians, nurses, psychologists, and counselors,
from doing work within the standards and ethics of their respective
professions, provided that they do not hold themselves out to the public by
02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
any title or description of services as a disease intervention specialist.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the employment
by healthcare facilities of persons who commonly perform services within the
definition of disease intervention, so long as the services are performed
within the course of and scope of their employment as employees of healthcare
facilities and they do not hold themselves out to the public by any title or
description of services as disease intervention specialists. This chapter
does not require an employee of a healthcare facility to be registered as a
disease intervention specialist as a condition of employment.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the
activities of a student or other person preparing for the profession of
disease intervention specialist, provided that disease intervention is
performed only under qualified supervision.

17-98-105. Unlawful practice — Penalties.
(a) If any person shall practice or hold himself or herself out to the
public as being engaged in the practice of disease intervention and is not
then currently registered to practice as a disease intervention specialist,
he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) Upon conviction, he or she shall be punished by a fine of not less
than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by
imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months, or by both fine and
imprisonment.
(c) Each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense.
(d) The State Board of Health shall assist the prosecuting attorney in
the enforcement of this chapter, and any member of the board may present
evidence of a violation to the appropriate prosecuting attorney.

17-98-106. Disclosure of information.
No registered disease intervention specialist or certified disease
intervention specialist, disease intervention specialist-in-training, or his
or her secretary, stenographer, or clerk, may disclose any information he or
she may have acquired from persons consulting him or her in his or her
professional capacity to any person except with the written consent of the
person or persons whose history is to be disclosed.

02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
17-98-107. Disposition of fees or payments.
(a) All fees or payments collected by the State Board of Health under
this chapter shall be deposited into a bank designated by the board, and the
board shall make a report annually to the Governor showing all receipts and
disbursements of moneys and a summary of all business transacted during the
year.
(b) Expense reimbursement for the board in accordance with § 25-16-901
et seq. and other expenses provided hereunder shall be paid by the board from
the fees collected by it.

Subchapter 2 — Administration by State Board of Health

17-98-201. [Repealed.]

17-98-202. [Repealed.]

17-98-203. Rules.
(a) The State Board of Health shall adopt such rules as are reasonably
necessary to administer this chapter.
(b) The Secretary for the State Board of Health may administer oaths
and subpoena witnesses.
(c)(1) The board shall promulgate rules establishing standards for
continuing education as a means to maintain professional competency.
(2) The standards shall be established in a manner to assure
that a variety of approved continuing education programs are available to
registered disease intervention specialists, including, but not limited to,
academic studies, in-service education, institutes, seminars, lectures,
conferences, workshops, extension courses, home study programs, articles
published, and scientific papers published.
(3) The continuing education units shall be awarded for direct
participation in courses approved by the board.
(d) The board may contract with another agency or association to
perform part or all of the duties in establishing procedures to record and
retain data on all registered disease intervention specialists in good
standing.

02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
Subchapter 3 — Examination and Registration

17-98-301. Examinations.
(a) The State Board of Health shall hold examinations to test the
fitness of applicants for registration at such times and places within this
state as the board shall determine. The board shall conduct at least one (1)
examination every year. The scope of the examination shall be determined by
the board.
(b) Within ninety (90) calendar days after an application is filed
with the Secretary for the State Board of Health, the board shall notify the
applicant whether his or her application for examination was accepted or
rejected and, if rejected, the reason therefor.
(c) The secretary shall give reasonable notice by mail of the time and
place of the examination to each applicant accepted for examination.
(d) Within sixty (60) calendar days after the examination, the board
shall notify by mail each examinee as to whether he or she has passed the
examination.
(e) Each person who passes the examination to the satisfaction of the
board shall be issued a certificate of registration upon payment of a
registration fee set by the board.

17-98-302. Admission to examination.
(a) The State Board of Health shall admit to examination any person
who makes application to the Secretary for the State Board of Health on forms
prescribed and furnished by the board, pays an application fee set by the
board to defray the expense of examination, and submits satisfactory proof to
the board that he or she:
(1) Meets the minimum educational requirements;
(2) Meets the minimum specialized training requirements, as
determined by the board;
(3) Has had two (2) years of field experience in human
immunodeficiency virus/sexually transmitted disease intervention; and
(4) Is actively engaged in the field of human immunodeficiency
virus/sexually transmitted disease intervention at the time he or she makes
application.
(b) The minimum educational requirements for admission to examination
02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
for registration as a disease intervention specialist shall be as follows:
(1) A bachelor's or master's of public health degree with
specialization in disease intervention from a school of public health
approved by the board; or
(2) A bachelor's degree with a minimum of thirty (30) semester
hours or its equivalent in biology, chemistry, physics, math, sociology,
psychology, or criminal justice, plus two (2) years' experience in disease
intervention or training courses approved by the board.
(c) Any person meeting the educational and specialized training
requirements of this chapter who does not meet the experience requirements of
this chapter may make application to the board, through a process prescribed
by the board, for acceptance as an associate disease intervention specialist.
The board shall accept such an application when submitted, if accompanied by
the required fee.
(d) Any person who meets the educational requirements of this chapter
but does not meet the specialized training requirements established for an
associate disease intervention specialist may make application to the board,
through a process prescribed by the board, for acceptance as a disease
intervention specialist-in-training.

17-98-303. Issuance of certificate without examination.
The State Board of Health shall issue a certificate of registration
without examination to any person who makes application on forms prescribed
and furnished by the board, pays a registration fee set by the board, and
submits satisfactory proof that he or she:
(1) Has had at least two (2) years' experience in the field of
human immunodeficiency virus/sexually transmitted disease intervention; and
(2) Is registered as a disease intervention specialist in a
state in which the qualifications for registration are not lower than the
qualifications for registration in this state at the time he or she applies
for registration.

17-98-304. Expiration and renewal.
(a) Each certificate of registration issued by the State Board of
Health shall expire on June 30 following the date of issue.
(b) A renewal certificate may be issued to the holder of a current
02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
certificate of registration who makes application before the expiration of
his or her certificate and pays a renewal fee set by the board. Satisfactory
proof of complying with the board's continuing education requirements must
accompany renewal applications.

17-98-305. Application for reinstatement.
(a) A former registered disease intervention specialist whose
certificate has expired or has been suspended or revoked may make application
for reinstatement by paying a renewal fee and submitting satisfactory proof
to the State Board of Health that he or she has complied with the continuing
education requirements.
(b) The board shall consider the professional qualifications of the
applicant as in the case of an original application.

17-98-306. Refusal to renew — Suspension or revocation.
The State Board of Health may refuse to renew or may suspend or revoke
a certificate upon proof that the applicant is guilty of fraud, deceit, gross
negligence, incompetency, or misconduct relative to his or her duties as a
disease intervention specialist.

17-98-307. Hearing and notice.
(a)(1) Before the State Board of Health may suspend, revoke, or refuse
to renew a certificate of registration, it shall set the matter for a hearing
before the board, and, at least twenty (20) calendar days before the date set
for hearing, it shall give written notice to the accused of the charges made
and the date and place of the hearing.
(2) Service of the notice may be made by personal service or by
sending it by registered mail to the last known business address of the
accused.
(3) The accused shall have the opportunity to be heard in person
and by counsel.
(4) A stenographic record of the hearing shall be kept, and a
transcript thereof filed with the board.
(b) The order of the board shall be issued within thirty (30) days
after the termination of the hearing.
(c) Notice of the order of the board shall be given to the accused,
02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299

HB1478
either by personal service or by registered mail sent to the last known
business address of the accused, within ten (10) calendar days after the
order is issued.

































02/13/2025 8:47:01 AM JMB299